Wisconsin, session 2025, AB780.
do enact as follows:AB780,11Section 1. 15.347 (2) of the statutes is repealed.AB780,22Section 2. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 3insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table - See PDF for table - See PDF for table - See PDF for table - See PDF for table AB780,311Section 3. 20.370 (4) (eq) of the statutes is repealed.AB780,412Section 4. 20.370 (6) (eq) of the statutes is repealed.AB780,513Section 5. 20.370 (6) (et) of the statutes is created to read:AB780,3,3120.370 (6) (et) Environmental aids — revitalize Wisconsin program. 2Biennially, from the environmental fund, the amounts in the schedule for aid 3awards under s. 292.66 and to make any required payments under s. 25.43 (2t).AB780,64Section 6. 20.370 (6) (eu) of the statutes is created to read:AB780,3,10520.370 (6) (eu) Environmental aids — waste removal and sampling. 6Biennially, from the environmental fund, the amounts in the schedule to provide 7financial assistance for the purpose of removing waste materials that have 8accumulated or been dumped on abandoned properties and to conduct sampling 9and testing to determine if those properties pose a risk to public health and safety 10or the environment.AB780,711Section 7. 20.370 (9) (nq) of the statutes is repealed.AB780,812Section 8. 20.566 (1) (r) of the statutes is amended to read:AB780,3,151320.566 (1) (r) Administration of dry cleaner fees. From the dry cleaner 14environmental response environmental fund, the amounts in the schedule for the 15purpose of administering the fees under subch. XII of ch. 77.AB780,916Section 9. 25.17 (1) (d) of the statutes is repealed.AB780,1017Section 10. 25.43 (2s) of the statutes is repealed.AB780,1118Section 11. 25.43 (2t) of the statutes is created to read:AB780,3,221925.43 (2t) The secretary of administration and the secretary of natural 20resources shall ensure that any moneys required to be repaid to the environmental 21improvement fund as a result of a transfer under s. 25.43 (2s), 2023 stats., shall be 22paid from the environmental fund to the environmental improvement fund.AB780,1223Section 12. 25.46 (1) (s) of the statutes is created to read:AB780,4,2125.46 (1) (s) All moneys received under s. 77.9964 (3) for environmental 2management.AB780,133Section 13. 25.46 (2m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB780,4,7425.46 (2m) Of the moneys described in sub. (1) that are received for the 5purpose of environmental management, except the moneys described in sub. (1) (ej), 6(ek), (hm), (j), (jj), (s), (t), and (u), $6,150,000 shall, in each fiscal year, be considered 7to have been received for the purpose of nonpoint source water pollution abatement.AB780,148Section 14. 25.48 of the statutes is repealed.AB780,159Section 15. 77.9964 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB780,4,111077.9964 (3) The department shall deposit all of the revenue that it collects 11under this subchapter in the environmental fund under s. 25.48.AB780,1612Section 16. 292.65 (14) of the statutes is amended to read:AB780,4,1413292.65 (14) Sunset. This section does not apply after June 30, 2032 the 14effective date of this subsection .... [LRB inserts date].AB780,1715Section 17. 292.66 of the statutes is created to read:AB780,4,1616292.66 Revitalize Wisconsin program. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB780,4,1917(a) “Brownfield” means a property that is abandoned, idle, or underused, the 18expansion or redevelopment of which is adversely affected by actual or perceived 19discharge or environmental pollution.AB780,4,2020(b) “Innocent landowner” means any of the following:AB780,5,3211. A property owner that acquired the property prior to November 1, 2006, has 22continuously owned the property since the date of acquisition, and can 23demonstrate, through documentation, that the discharge or environmental 1pollution on the property was caused by another person and that the property 2owner did not know and had no reason to know of the discharge or environmental 3pollution when the owner acquired the property.AB780,5,1042. A property owner that acquired the property on or after November 1, 2006, 5has continuously owned the property since the date of acquisition, and can 6demonstrate, through documentation, that the property owner conducted all 7appropriate inquiries in compliance with 40 CFR part 312 prior to acquisition, that 8the discharge or environmental pollution on the property was caused by another 9person, and that the property owner did not know and had no reason to know of the 10discharge or environmental pollution when the owner acquired the property.AB780,5,1411(c) “Interim action” means a response action that is taken to contain or 12stabilize a discharge or environmental pollution at a site or facility, in order to 13minimize any threats to public health, safety, or welfare or to the environment, 14while other response actions are being taken or planned for the site or facility.AB780,5,1515(d) “Local governmental unit” has the meaning given in s. 292.11 (9) (e) 1.AB780,5,1616(e) “Private party” means any of the following:AB780,5,17171. A bank, trust company, savings bank, or credit union.AB780,5,18182. A developer, as defined in s. 66.0617 (1) (b).AB780,5,22193. An organization or enterprise, other than a sole proprietorship, that is 20operated for profit or that is nonprofit and nongovernmental, including an 21association, business trust, corporation, joint venture, limited liability company, 22limited liability partnership, partnership, or syndicate.AB780,5,23234. An innocent landowner. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab780 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab780 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB780 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB780 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB780: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting